Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1314
State Employees
Defined Contribution Retirement Expense Fund; State Employees Cash Balance
Retirement Expense Fund; created; use; investment.

(1)
The State Employees Defined Contribution Retirement Expense Fund is created.
The fund shall be credited with money from the retirement system assets and
income sufficient to pay the pro rata share of administrative expenses incurred
as directed by the board for the proper administration of the State Employees
Retirement Act and necessary in connection with the administration and operation
of the retirement system, except as provided in sections 84-1309.02, 84-1310.01,
and 84-1311.03. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(2) The State Employees Cash Balance Retirement Expense Fund
is created. The fund shall be credited with money forfeited pursuant to section
84-1321.01 and with money from the retirement system assets and income sufficient
to pay the pro rata share of administrative expenses incurred as directed
by the board for the proper administration of the State Employees Retirement
Act and necessary in connection with the administration and operation of the
retirement system, except as provided in sections 84-1309.02, 84-1310.01,
and 84-1311.03. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion
Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

(3) Forfeiture
funds collected from members participating in the defined contribution benefit
shall be used to either pay expenses or reduce employer contributions related
to the defined contribution benefit. Any unused funds shall be allocated as
earnings of and transferred to the accounts of the remaining members within
twelve months after receipt of the funds by the board.

Laws 1997, LB 623, § 40;

Laws 2000, LB 1200, § 7;

Laws 2001, LB 408, § 28;

Laws 2003, LB 451, § 26;

Laws 2005, LB 364, § 18;

Laws 2007, LB328, § 8;

Laws 2010, LB950, § 25;

Laws 2013, LB263, § 38.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.